Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-689
Prosecutions where penalty not specifically provided.

Any person who is found guilty of a traffic infraction in violation of the Nebraska Rules of the Road for which a penalty has not been specifically provided shall be fined:

(1) Not more than one hundred dollars for the first offense;

(2) Not more than two hundred dollars for a second offense within a one-year period; and

(3) Not more than three hundred dollars for a third and subsequent offense within a one-year period.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 112;

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 12;

Laws 1975, LB 547, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 207;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,112;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 185.